Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-2613
Reasonable attempt to repair, defined.

Reasonable attempt to repair means within the terms of an express warranty applicable to a new assistive device:

(1) Any nonconformity within the warranty that has been repaired by the manufacturer, the assistive device lessor, or any of the manufacturer's authorized assistive device dealers on at least two previous occasions and a nonconformity continues; or

(2) The assistive device is out of service for repair for an aggregate of at least thirty cumulative days because of warranty nonconformity.

Laws 1997, LB 802, § 13.